Utah statutes.
71-8-3.   Duties of executive director -- Services to veterans.
The executive director shall:
(1)  be responsible for the administration and the operation or support of the
following veteran-related operations:
(a)  Utah State Veterans' Nursing Homes and Programs;
(b)  Utah State Veterans' Cemetery and Memorial Park;
(c)  Title 71, Chapter 10, Veteran's Preference;
(d)  any locally or federally funded programs for homeless veterans within the
state; and
(e)  any federally funded education services for veterans within the state;
(2)  maintain liaison with local, state, and federal veterans' agencies and
with Utah veterans' organizations;
(3)  provide current information so that veterans, their surviving spouses and
family members, and Utah veterans' organizations will be aware of benefits to
which they are, or may become, entitled;
(4)  reach out and assist veterans and their families in applying for benefits
and services;
(5)  develop and maintain a system for determining how many veterans are
employed by the various government entities within the state and keeping track
of them; and
(6)  cooperate with other state entities in the receipt of information to
create and maintain a record of veterans in Utah.
